New York, session 2025-2026, A4647.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1115 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision (mm) to read as follows: 3 (mm) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 4 receipts from the sale of school buses, as such term is defined in 5 section one hundred forty-two of the vehicle and traffic law and parts, 6 equipment, lubricants and fuel purchased and used in their operation, 7 shall be exempt from taxes imposed by this article. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of a quarterly sales 9 tax period, as set forth in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the tax 10 law, next succeeding April 1, 2026. Effective immediately, the addi- 11 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 12 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 13 be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08798-01-5